Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-302
Endowments; exemption from taxation and certain claims.

Such endowment funds or property shall be exempt from all taxation, attachment, execution and claims whatsoever except for labor and material furnished in the performance of the purposes of the endowment.

Laws 1915, c. 173, § 1, p. 357;

C.S.1922, § 415;

C.S.1929, § 13-301;

R.S.1943, § 12-302.